District of Columbia statutes.
22-1710

Repealed

Penalty for bucketing or keeping bucket-shop.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, ch. 854, § 869b
Mar. 1, 1909, 35 Stat. 671, ch. 233
June 25, 1936, 49 Stat. 1921, ch. 804
June 25, 1948, 62 Stat. 909, 991, ch. 646, §§ 1, 32(b)
May 24, 1949, 63 Stat. 107, ch. 139, § 127
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 570, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 155(c) (1) (E)
Aug. 20, 1994, D.C. Law 10-151, § 105(l), 41 DCR 2608
Apr. 29, 2004, D.C. Law 15-154, § 3(h), 50 DCR 10996
1981 Ed., § 22-1510.
1973 Ed., § 22-1510.
For temporary amendment of section, see § 105(l) of the Omnibus Criminal Justice Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 1994 (D.C. Act 10-255, June 22, 1994, 41 DCR 4286).
This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 401 of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to a single Commissioner. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.